Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 2.1 Commercial Fishing Licenses

20-2.1-1.
Findings.

The general assembly finds and declares:

That the constitution of the state places plenary authority and responsibility in the general assembly to provide for the conservation of natural resources of the state, including its marine fisheries;

That the state of Rhode Island has historically established programs to provide for and regulate harvesting, taking, landing, and selling marine finfish, crustaceans, and shellfish for the benefit of the people of the state;

That federal government and regional entities have established, and continue to establish, regulatory programs, management measures, quotas, and restrictions that affect persons engaged in marine fisheries in Rhode Island, and that Rhode Island functions in whole or in part in the context of these federal and regional programs depending on the marine species;

That the department of environmental management, in accordance with the requirements of §

20-3.1-7(1)

, has issued goals and principles pertaining to biological, socio-economic, and licensing and data collection issues that present;

That the rights and interests of residents of Rhode Island to engage in fishing, including commercial fishing, need to be recognized and protected;

That the rights and interests of persons engaged in commercial fishing are affected by fisheries management programs and allocations and need to be reported and be given consideration; and

That Rhode Island’s statutes and programs for marine fisheries management and licensure developed over time and need to be brought up-to-date and made adaptable to changing conditions and circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4.

20-2.1-2.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are, through a system of licensure that is clear, predictable, and adaptable to changing conditions, to:

Preserve, enhance, and allow for any necessary regeneration of the fisheries of the state, for the benefit of the people of the state, as an ecological asset and as a source of food and recreation;

Provide Rhode Islanders who wish to fish commercially the opportunity to do so and end the moratorium on issuance of new commercial fishing licenses so that new licenses may be issued for the year beginning January 1, 2003, and each year thereafter;

Allow residents who have fished commercially to sell their vessels and gear in a manner that first, facilitates up-grading license levels among residents already in the fishery; that second, provides lateral movement among residents who are holders of commercial fishing licenses to other types of fishing; and that third, enables new entrants into new commercial fishing;

Respect the interests of residents who fish under licenses issued by the state and wish to continue to fish commercially in a manner that is economically viable; provided, it is specifically not a purpose of this chapter to establish licensing procedures that eliminate the ability to fish commercially of any resident as of the date of enactment who validly holds commercial fishing license and who meets the application renewal requirements set forth herein;

Preserve and enhance full-time commercial fishing, with a high degree of participation by owner-operated vessels, as a way of life and as a significant industry in Rhode Island;

Establish principles, for a system of adaptive management, that shall be used by the department in licensure programs and fisheries management, which principles shall include:

The foregoing purposes; and

As appropriate, necessary, and effective, the following measures:

Regulation of the design and use of gear;

Limitations on the amount of gear that may be used by a license holder;

Restrictions on when and where commercial fishing may be done;

Quotas and limitations on catch or landings; and

Restrictions on the number of license holders;

Provide a licensure system that facilitates data collection and management so that marine fisheries can be managed more efficiently and effectively. In accordance with this purpose, the system shall include a firm annual renewal deadline, as established herein, for the submittal of applications to renew licenses or obtain new licenses. An annual grace period, as established herein, shall allow fishermen an additional opportunity to renew their licenses from the immediately preceding year, subject to payment of a late fee; however, after the expiration of the grace period, there shall be no opportunity to appeal the denial of a commercial fishing license unless the applicant can show that the failure to apply during the grace period was due to documented medical hardship.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 3.

20-2.1-3.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter the following terms shall mean:

“Activity standard” means a level of fishing participation used to establish criteria for the issuance of new licenses.

“Commercial fisherman” means a natural person licensed to catch, harvest, or take marine species from the marine waters for sale.

“Council” means the marine fisheries council established by chapter 3 of this title.

“Crustaceans” means lobsters, crabs, shrimp, and for purposes of this chapter it also includes horseshoe crabs.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Family member” means a spouse, mother, father, brother, sister, child, or grandchild of the holder or transferor of a commercial fishing license.

“Finfish” means cold-blooded aquatic vertebrates with fins, including fish, sharks, rays, skates, and eels and also includes, for the purposes of this chapter, squid.

“Fisheries sectors” means and comprises crustaceans, finfish, and shellfish, as defined in this section, each of which shall singularly be considered a fishery sector.

“Fishery endorsement” means the authorization for a license holder to participate in a designated fishery sector at a limited or unlimited level.

“Grace period” means sixty (60) calendar days commencing the last day of February and shall only apply to renewals of licenses from the immediately preceding year.

“Medical hardship” means a significant medical condition that renders an active licensed person unable to fish for a period in excess of fourteen (14) days, either as a result of the physical loss of function or impairment of a body part or parts, or debilitating pain. Demonstration of the medical hardship shall be in the form of a diagnosis and prognosis signed by a medical doctor (M.D. or O.D.).

“Medical incapacity” means death or injury that renders an active license holder permanently unable to actively fish. Demonstration of medical incapacity shall be in the form of a death certificate, or a diagnosis and prognosis signed by a medical doctor (M.D. or O.D.).

“Other endorsement” means the authorization for a license holder or vessel to participate in a designated activity.

“Shellfish” means quahogs, clams, mussels, scallops, oysters, conches, and mollusks in general other than squid.

“Student commercial fisherman” means a resident twenty-three (23) years of age or younger, licensed pursuant to this chapter, who is a full-time student.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.

20-2.1-4.
General provisions governing licenses issued.

Applicability. It shall be unlawful for any person in Rhode Island or the waters of the state: (1) To take, harvest, possess, hold, or transport for sale in Rhode Island any marine species without a license issued under the provisions of this title; provided, however, that marine species may be transported by a duly licensed dealer if the marine species have previously been sold by a duly licensed person; or (2) To engage in commercial fishing from a vessel unless the vessel has been declared a commercial fishing vessel as provided in §

20-2.1-5(3)

and has a decal affixed to it or is displaying a plate.

Validation of license. No license issued under this chapter shall be valid until signed by the licensee in his or her own handwriting.

Transfer or loan of license. Unless otherwise provided for in this title, a license issued to a person under this chapter shall be good only for the person to whom it is issued and any transfer or loan of the license shall be grounds for revocation or suspension of that license pursuant to §

20-2-13

.

Reporting and inspections condition of license. All persons granted a license under the provisions of this chapter are deemed to have consented to the reporting requirements applicable to commercial fishing actively that are established pursuant to this title and to the reasonable inspection of any vessel, net, rake, bullrake, tong, dredge, trap, pot, vehicle, structure, or other contrivance used regularly for the keeping or storage of marine species, and any creel, box, locker, basket, crate, blind, fishing, or paraphernalia used in conjunction with the licensed activity by persons duly authorized by the director. The provisions of §

20-1-8(a)(7)(ii)

shall apply to these inspections.

Possession, inspection, and display of license. Every person holding a license issued under this chapter shall have that license in his or her possession at all times while engaged in the licensed activity and shall present the license for inspection on demand by any authorized person. Any person who shall refuse to present a license on demand shall be liable to the same punishment as if that person were fishing without a license.

Application for license. Every person entitled to a license under this chapter shall file an application with the director, or the director’s authorized agent, properly sworn to, stating the name, age, occupation, place of residence, mailing address, weight, height, and color of hair and eyes of the applicant for whom the license is wanted and providing any other information that may be required pursuant to rule in order to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, and pay the fees as provided in this chapter. All licenses issued under this chapter shall be valid only for the calendar year of issuance, unless otherwise specified in this chapter or in the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. If the person will be either the owner or the operator as provided in §

20-2.1-5(7)

of a commercial fishing vessel, the person shall declare, on the application for each commercial fishing vessel, the vessel name, length, horsepower, state registration number or coast guard documentation number, federal permit number, and average projected crew size.

Application deadline, grace period for renewals, and limitation on appeals after the deadlines. For commercial marine fishing licenses provided for in §§

20-2.1-5

and

20-2.1-6

, the following provisions shall apply:

Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, an individual qualified to obtain a license must submit an application to the department of environmental management no later than the last day of February; a license application shall be deemed valid if submitted to the department prior to the close of regular office hours on the last day of February or if postmarked by the last day of February;

Unless otherwise specified in this title, no new or renewed licenses shall be issued after the last day of February of each year, unless an applicant has submitted an application by the deadline required by this section;

The department shall notify all license holders, in writing, regarding the December 31 expiration and the renewal deadline no later than November 1 of each year;

For renewals of existing commercial marine fishing licenses that expire on December 31 of the immediately preceding year, there shall be a sixty-day (60) grace period from the renewal deadline; licenses issued during the grace period shall be subject to a late fee in the amount of two hundred dollars ($200) in addition to all other applicable fees;

Except as provided for in subsection (g)(4) of this section or §

20-2.1-5

(1)(iii), the department shall not accept any applications submitted after the last day of February; and

There shall be no right to request an appeal to the department of environmental management’s administrative adjudication division (AAD) for the rejection of any new license applications submitted after the last day of February, or any license renewal applications submitted after the sixty-day (60) grace period. In the case of a documented medical condition that prevents a license applicant from meeting the application requirements, the license applicant has no more than one year after the expiration of a license to appeal to AAD. Demonstration of such medical condition shall be in the form of a diagnosis and prognosis signed by a medical doctor (M.D. or O.D.).

Lost or destroyed licenses and duplicate licenses. Whoever loses, or by a mistake or accident destroys his or her certificate of a commercial marine fisheries license, may, upon application to the department accompanied by an affidavit fully setting forth the circumstances of the loss, receive a duplicate certificate license for the remainder of the year covered by the original certificate, for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each duplicate license.

Revocation of licenses.

License revocation. The license of any person who has violated the provisions of this chapter, or rules adopted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or rules and regulations that pertain to commercial fishing and reporting issued pursuant to this title, may be suspended or revoked by the director as the director shall determine by regulation. Any person aggrieved by an order of suspension or revocation may appeal this order in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42.

False statements and violations; cancellation of license. Any person who willfully makes a false representation as to birthplace or requirements of identification or of other facts required in an application for license under this chapter, or is otherwise directly or indirectly a party to a false representation, shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). A license obtained by any person through a false representation shall be null and void, and the license shall be surrendered immediately to the director. No license shall be issued under this title to this person for a period of one year from the date of imposition of a penalty under this section.

False, altered, forged, or counterfeit licenses. Every person who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits, or who causes to be made, altered, forged, or counterfeited, a license issued under this chapter or title or purporting to be a license issued under this chapter or title, or who shall have in his or her possession such a license knowing it to be false, altered, forged, or counterfeit, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties prescribed in §

20-1-16

.

Expiration. Unless otherwise specified in this title, all licenses issued under this chapter shall be annual and shall expire on December 31 of each year. It shall be unlawful for any person to fish commercially in Rhode Island waters on an expired license; and the application and grace periods set forth in subsections (g)(1) and (g)(4) above shall not extend the validity of any expired license.

Notice of change of address. Whenever any person holding any commercial fishing license shall move from the address named in his or her last application, that person shall, within ten (10) days subsequent to moving, notify the office of boat registration and licensing of his or her former and current address.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.

20-2.1-5.
Resident licenses, endorsements, and fees.

The director shall establish, as a minimum, the following types of licenses and endorsements set forth in this section. In addition, the director may establish any other classes and types of licenses and endorsements, consistent with the provisions of this chapter and with adopted management plans that may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter:

Types of licenses.

Standard resident c ommercial fishing license. Rhode Island residents shall be eligible to obtain a standard resident commercial fishing license; the license shall allow the holder to engage in commercial fishing in fisheries sectors dictated by the fishery endorsement(s) associated with the license. Fishery endorsements shall be established by the department consistent with fishery management plans developed pursuant to this chapter.

Multi purpose license. All multipurpose purpose license holders as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year shall be eligible to obtain a multipurpose license that shall allow the holder to engage in commercial fishing in all fisheries sectors.

Student shellfish license. A resident twenty-three (23) years or younger shall pay fifty dollars ($50.00) for a student commercial license to take shellfish upon provision of proof of full-time student status. An individual qualified to obtain a license must submit an application to the department of environmental management no later than June 30; a license application shall be deemed valid if submitted to the department prior to the close of regular office hours on June 30 or if postmarked by June 30.

Over sixty-five (65) shellfish license. A resident sixty-five (65) years of age and over shall be eligible for a shellfish license to shellfish commercially and there shall be no fee for this license.

Multipurpose vessel license. Any multipurpose license holder shall be eligible to obtain a multipurpose vessel license that shall allow the vessel owner to designate any operator to engage in commercial fishing for all marine species aboard their owned vessel, provided the vessel owner has consigned a multipurpose fishing license to the department. The department may then re-issue the consigned multipurpose fishing license to the commercially declared fishing vessel as a multipurpose vessel license. The director has the authority to limit the number of multipurpose vessel licenses issued annually by rule. The fee for a multipurpose vessel license shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Fees.

Standard resident commercial fishing license.

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus one limited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus two limited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be two hundred dollars ($200).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus three limited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus one unlimited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus one unlimited fishery endorsement and one limited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus two unlimited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus one unlimited fishery endorsement and two limited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be four hundred dollars ($400).

Standard resident commercial fishing license plus two unlimited fishery endorsements and one limited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be four hundred twenty-five dollars ($425).

Multipurpose license: The fee shall be four hundred fifty dollars ($450).

Vessel declaration and fees .

The department shall require the owner and/or the operator of a commercial fishing vessel to declare the vessel on the owner/operator’s commercial fishing license. The declaration shall be made at the time of initial license issuance and each renewal, or prior to the vessel being used for commercial fishing by the owner and/or operator if the first usage of the vessel for commercial fishing occurs during the course of a year after the license has been issued or renewed. If the declaration is for a vessel of less than twenty-five feet (25´) in length, the declaration shall be transferable to another vessel less than twenty-five feet (25´) in length, provided the vessel is identified as a commercial fishing vessel while it is being used for commercial fishing by displaying a plate as provided in §

20-2.1-4

.

The annual fee for each vessel declaration shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first twenty-five feet (25´) or under, plus fifty cents ($0.50) per foot for each whole foot over twenty-five feet (25´); this declaration fee shall entitle the holder to a decal. The holder of a valid decal for twenty-five feet (25´) in length or under may obtain a plate from the department for display on a vessel twenty-five feet (25´) in length that is being used temporarily for commercial fishing; the annual fee for a plate shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00).

Gear endorsements and fees.

Gill net endorsements. A person who holds a multipurpose license, or a vessel with a multipurpose vessel license, is also eligible to apply for a commercial gill net endorsement in accordance with the provisions of this section. The fee for a commercial gill net endorsement shall be twenty dollars ($20.00). Applicants who possessed a gill net endorsement as of the immediately preceding year may obtain a gill net endorsement for the immediately following year. New gill net endorsement opportunities shall be established by the department by rule, pursuant to applicable management plans.

Other endorsements. The department may establish by rule any endorsements that may be necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and facilitate participation in a specific fishery; the fee for such endorsement shall not be greater than two hundred dollars ($200). This endorsement shall be issued only in a manner consistent with the general requirements of this chapter, including specifically those governing residency.

New licenses.

Eligibility. For new standard resident commercial fishing and multipurpose licenses, priority shall be given to applicants who have held a commercial fishing license for two (2) years or more; applicants with military service; and applicants who have completed a department authorized commercial fishing training program, with preference to family members and crew members of a license holder who is retiring his or her license.

Priority or preference applicants. A new license shall be granted to priority/preference applicants who have acquired a vessel and/or gear from a license holder who has retired a license, provided, that as the result of any such transaction, for each license retired, not more than one new license may be granted, nor may the nominal effort, including the total number of licenses, in a fishery subject to effort controls or catch restrictions be increased.

Availability of new or additional licenses. New standard resident commercial fishing and multipurpose licenses that increase the total number of licenses in the fishery may be made available by rule consistent with management plan for issuance effective January 1, in any year, based on status of resource and economic condition of fishery. Priority for new licenses shall be given to Rhode Island residents.

Retirement of licenses. Issuance of a commercial fishing license shall not be deemed to create a property right such that the license can be sold or transferred by the license holder; fishing licenses shall be surrendered to the state upon their nonrenewal, forfeiture, or revocation.

Issuance of temporary operator permits in cases of medical hardship. The department shall make available, as necessary, temporary operator permits to provide solely for the continued operation of a fishing vessel upon the determination of medical hardship of a license holder who has actively fished. Temporary operator permits shall be subject at a minimum to the conditions and restrictions that applied to the license holder.

Issuance of new licenses to family members in cases of medical incapacity. Upon determination of medical incapacity, an actively fished license may be surrendered to the department for the purpose of the concurrent issuance of a new license to a resident family member.

Issuance of new licenses upon the sale of a commercial fishing business. Upon the sale of a commercial fishing business, as defined by rule, a new license may be issued to the buyer upon the surrender of the seller’s license to the department for the purpose of the concurrent issuance of a new license.

Transfer of vessels and gear. Vessels and gear may be sold, transferred, or disposed at the sole discretion of the owner; provided, however, that the subsequent level of use of the gear may be restricted in Rhode Island waters in order to accomplish the purposes of a duly adopted management plan or other duly adopted program to reduce effort.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

20-2.1-6.
Nonresident licenses, endorsements, and fees.

Subject to the rules of the department, nonresidents may apply for the following commercial fishing licenses:

Standard n onresident commercial fishing license.

Nonresidents age eighteen (18) and over shall be eligible to obtain a standard nonresident commercial fishing license and, in accordance with applicable qualifying criteria, available fishery sector endorsements, provided that the state of residence of the person affords the same privilege in a manner that is not more restrictive to Rhode Island residents. A standard nonresident commercial fishing license shall allow the license holder to harvest, land, and sell in a lawful manner any marine species, as dictated by the fishery endorsement(s) associated with the license. Fishery endorsements shall be established by the department consistent with fishery management plans developed pursuant to this chapter.

Duly Rhode Island-licensed nonresidents in a commercial fishery as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year shall be eligible to obtain a standard nonresident commercial fishing license with a single sector endorsement applicable to the fishery sectors for which they were licensed as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year; provided:

That the state of residence of the person affords the same privilege in a manner that is not more restrictive to Rhode Island residents;

That those persons apply for the standard nonresident commercial fishing license in accordance with §

20-2.1-4(g)

; and

That those persons shall also be subject to any other restrictions that were applicable to the license as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year, which other restrictions may be altered or changed consistent with fishery management plans developed pursuant to this chapter.

Persons not duly licensed as of December 31 of the immediately preceding year shall be eligible to obtain a standard nonresident commercial fishing license, per endorsement, when available, consistent with fishery management plans developed pursuant to this chapter, in accordance with applicable qualifying criteria, provided that the state of residence of the person affords the same privilege in a manner that is not more restrictive to Rhode Island residents.

Fees.

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license.

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus one limited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be three hundred fifty dollars ($350).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus one unlimited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be seven hundred dollars ($700).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus two limited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be seven hundred dollars ($700).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus three limited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be one thousand fifty dollars ($1,050).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus one unlimited fishery endorsement and one limited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be one thousand fifty dollars ($1,050).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus one unlimited fishery endorsement and two limited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus two unlimited fishery endorsements: The fee shall be one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400).

Standard nonresident commercial fishing license plus two unlimited and one limited fishery endorsement: The fee shall be one thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($1,750).

Vessel declaration and fees. The department shall require a nonresident owner and/or operator of a commercial fishing vessel to make a declaration for that vessel; which shall be made at the time of initial license issuance and each renewal, or prior to the vessel’s being used for commercial fishing in Rhode Island waters by the nonresident owner and/or operator if the first usage of the vessel for commercial fishing occurs during the course of a year after the license has been issued or renewed, for a cost of fifty dollars ($50.00), plus one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each whole foot over twenty-five feet (25´) in length overall.

New licenses. Any resident of a state that accords to Rhode Island residents commercial fishing privileges that include an ability to obtain a new license to fish for finfish species that are subject to restrictions and/or quotas, may on species specific reciprocal basis be eligible to obtain standard nonresident commercial fishing licenses by endorsement as provided in this section, subject to availability and with the priority established in §

20-2.1-5(5)(i)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 8, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 16, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

20-2.1-7.
Landing permits and fees.

All residents or nonresidents, with the exception of persons or vessels with qualifying Rhode Island fishing licenses, who have charge of a vessel carrying seafood products legally harvested outside Rhode Island waters shall obtain a permit to land, sell, or offer for sale seafood products in Rhode Island. The permit shall be issued by the department upon proof that the applicant holds a valid state or federal commercial fishing license.

Resident landing permit: for the landing, sale, or offering for sale of marine species (including process product), caught by any means. The fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

Nonresident landing permit: for the landing, sale, or offering for sale of marine species (including process product), caught by any means, excluding restricted species as defined by rule. The fee shall be six hundred dollars ($600).

Nonresident exempted landing permits.

A new landing permit shall not be issued to any nonresident to off-load, land, offer for sale, or sell any restricted marine species, the definition of which shall be established by the department by rule and shall take into account species for which a quota has been allocated to the state of Rhode Island by the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission or the National Marine Fisheries Service, unless:

The landing shall be counted against the quota of the state where the vessel making the landing is registered or documented; or

The state where the vessel making the landing is registered or documented issues new landing permits to Rhode Island residents to land against that state’s quota for the same species.

For purposes of this section, the renewal of any nonresident landing permit shall be considered a new nonresident landing permit unless the applicant can show, to the satisfaction of the director, historic participation in the fishery and landings of the species; and any change or upgrade of a vessel twenty percent (20%) or greater in length, displacement, or horsepower above the named vessel shall be considered a new landing permit. Issuance of a landing permit shall not be deemed to create a property right that can be sold, transferred, or encumbered; landing permits shall be surrendered to the state upon their nonrenewal or forfeiture, and the acquisition of a named vessel by a nonresident who does not already have a landing permit shall not entitle the nonresident to a landing permit unless a new landing permit can be issued as allowed in this section.

Fee: The fee shall be six hundred dollars ($600).

Landing permits shall be valid for the calendar year in which they are issued.

The department shall adopt any rules and procedures that may be necessary for the timely issuance of these permits in order to facilitate the off-loading and sale of seafood products, except restricted finfish, harvested outside Rhode Island waters.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a commercial vessel with seafood products on board may, without a landing permit, enter Rhode Island waters and be secured to a shoreside facility for purposes other than landing, selling, or offering for sale the seafood products on board if the person having charge of the vessel obtains permission from the department’s division of law enforcement prior to securing the vessel to the shoreside facility.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.

20-2.1-8.
Dealers’ licenses and fees.

No person, partnership, firm, association, or corporation shall barter or trade in marine species taken by persons licensed under this chapter unless a license so to do has been obtained from the director of environmental management.

Any licensee operating under the provisions of this section shall purchase marine species from licensed persons only and shall purchase or possess only those lobsters legally taken or possessed.

The director shall issue and enforce rules and regulations and orders governing bartering and trading in marine species by licensed persons of marine species and licensed dealers, and other persons, partnerships, firms, associations, or corporations.

License types and fees.

Multipurpose dealer’s license This license shall allow the dealer to purchase or sell all marine products in the state of Rhode Island. The license shall be valid for the calendar year in which it is issued. The fee shall be four hundred and fifty dollars ($450).

Finfish dealer’s license. This license shall allow the dealer to purchase or sell all finfish products in the state of Rhode Island. The license shall be valid for the calendar year in which it is issued. The fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

Shellfish dealer’s license. This license shall allow the dealer to purchase or sell all shellfish products in the state of Rhode Island. The license shall be valid for the calendar year in which it is issued. The fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

Crustacean dealer license. This license shall allow the dealer to purchase all crustacean products in the state of Rhode Island. The license shall be valid for the calendar year in which it is issued. The fee shall be three hundred dollars ($300).

Seafood dealers license — Suspension or revocation. The director may suspend, revoke, or deny the license of a seafood dealer or fisher of marine species for the violation of any provision of this title or the rules, regulations, or orders adopted or issued pursuant to this title.

Any person aggrieved by the decisions of the director may appeal the decision pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

The director is authorized to enter and inspect the business premises, appurtenant structures, vehicles, or vessels of any seafood dealer and to inspect the records maintained by a seafood dealer for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of this section and any rules, regulations, or orders issued under this section, and no person shall interfere with, obstruct the entrance, or inspection of the director or the director’s agents of those business premises, appurtenant structures, vehicles, or vessels.

Any violation of the provisions of this section or any rule, regulation, or order adopted under this section shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in §

20-1-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 47, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 7, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.